District of Columbia statutes.
29-309.01

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Acquired corporation” means the domestic or foreign corporation whose shares are acquired in a share exchange.

(2)

“Acquiring corporation” means the domestic or foreign corporation that acquires shares in a share exchange.

(3)

“Merger” means a business combination pursuant to § 29-309.02.

(A)

Merge under a plan of merger;

(B)

Acquire shares of another corporation or an eligible entity in a share exchange; or

(C)

Have all of its shares or all of one or more classes or series of its shares acquired in a share exchange.

(4)

“Party to a merger” or “party to a share exchange” means any domestic or foreign corporation that will:

(5)

“Share exchange” means a business combination pursuant to § 29-309.03.

(6)

“Survivor” in a merger means the corporation into which one or more other corporations are merged. A survivor of a merger may preexist the merger or be created by the merger.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720